Utah statutes.
58-81-104.   Volunteer health care practitioner license -- Waiver of fees -- Rulemaking authority.

(1)  The division and board shall issue a volunteer health care practitioner license to an applicant who:

(a)  completes an application under Section 58-81-103; and

(b)  meets the requirements of this chapter.

(2)  A license issued under this chapter shall:

(a)  comply with the scope of practice for a similarly situated licensed practitioner, except that the license shall limit the health care practitioner's practice to the qualified location;

(b)  permit the health care practitioner to apply for a controlled substance license as permitted for other similarly situated licensed practitioners; and

(c)  state that the license is a volunteer health care practitioner license and is subject to the restriction of Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  The division and board shall waive all division fees, including application fees, examination fees, and annual renewal fees for an applicant who applies for a volunteer health care practitioner license and who otherwise meets licensure requirements.

(4)  The division and board may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:

(a)  approve the charity locations that qualify under Section 58-81-102;

(b)  develop standards for the information that must be included in a delegation of service agreement, including a standard form that a supervising professional may use; and

(c)  implement the provisions of this chapter.

(5)  A health care practitioner who is licensed as a volunteer health care practitioner under this chapter is entitled to qualified immunity for charity care if the health care practitioner meets the requirements of Section 58-13-3.



Enacted by Chapter 263, 2009 General Session

